ja: 電子機器 > 回路部品 > 基板用アクセサリー: 回路基板保護ケース; 回路基板スタンドオフ・スペーサー; ヒューズ・電池ホルダー; ヒートシンク; ジャンプワイヤー; ピンヘッダー・ソケットヘッダー
nb: Elektronikk > Kretskort og komponenter > Tilbehør til kretskort: Beskyttelsesvesker til kretskort; Kretskortavstandsholdere og -mellomlegg; Sikrings- og batteriholdere; Varmeavledere; Startledninger; Pinnehoder og sokkel­hoder
hr-HR: Elektronika > Tiskane pločice i komponente > Pribor za tiskane pločice: Zaštitna kućišta za tiskane pločice; Distanceri i odstojnici za tiskane pločice; Držači za osigurače i baterije; Procesorski hladnjaci; Spojne žice; Muški i ženski priključci
sk-SK: Elektronika > Dosky plošných spojov a komponenty > Príslušenstvo pre dosky plošných spojov: Ochranné puzdrá na dosky plošných spojov; Stĺpiky a rozperky obvodových dosiek; Držiaky poistiek a batérií; Chladiče; Prepojovacie vodiče; Kolíkové a zásuvkové lišty
ko: 전자기기 > 회로 기판/구성품 > 회로 기판 부대용품: 회로 기판 보호 케이스; 회로 기판 스탠드오프 및 스페이서; 퓨즈 및 배터리 홀더; 방열판; 점프용 전선; 핀 헤더 및 소켓 헤더
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电路板和组件 > 电路板配件: 电路板保护壳; 电路板支撑柱和垫片; 保险丝座和电池座; 散热片; 跳线; 排针和排母座
bg-BG: Електроника > Платки и компоненти > Аксесоари за платки: Защитни калъфи за платки; Дистанционери и разделители за платка; Държачи за предпазител и батерия; Радиатори; Джъмпери; Щифтови конектори и гнездови конектори
nl: Elektronica > Printplaten en componenten > Accessoires voor printplaten: Beschermdozen voor printplaten; Printplaat-afstandhouders en spacers; Zekering- en batterijhouders; Koellichamen; Springdraden; Pin headers en socket headers
pl: Elektronika > Płyty drukowane i komponenty > Akcesoria do płyt drukowanych: Futerały na płytki drukowane; Podstawy i dystansy płytek obwodów; Uchwycenia bezpieczników i baterii; Radiatory; Przewody zworkowe; Zaciski i gniazda nagłówka
fr: Appareil électronique > Circuits imprimés et composants de circuits > Accessoires pour circuits imprimés: Étuis de protection pour circuits imprimés; Entretoises et entretoises filetées pour circuits imprimés; Supports de fusibles et de batteries; Dissipateurs de chaleur; Câbles de liaison; Barrettes de broches et connecteurs femelles
en: Electronics > Circuit Boards & Components > Circuit Board Accessories: Circuit Board Protective Cases; Circuit Board Standoffs & Spacers; Fuse & Battery Holders; Heat Sinks; Jump Wires; Pin Headers & Socket Headers
da: Elektronik > Kredsløb og komponenter > Tilbehør til kredsløb: Beskyttelseskasser til kredsløb; Printkort – standoffs og fordelere; Sikrings- og batteriholdere; Varmeafledere; Jumpwires; Stift- og sokkelhoveder
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電路板和元件 > 電路板配件: 電路板保護殼; 電路板墊腳及隔離片; 保險絲及電池座; 散熱片; 跳線; 針座及座接器
cs: Elektronika > Plošné spoje a součástky > Příslušenství k deskám s plošnými spoji: Ochranná pouzdra pro desky s plošnými spoji; Distanční sloupky a vložky pro desky plošných spojů; Pojistkové a bateriové držáky; Chladiče; Propojovací vodiče; Kolíkové a zásuvkové lišty
ru: Электроника > Печатные платы и их компоненты > Аксессуары для печатных плат: Защитные кейсы для печатных плат; Стойки и распорки для печатных плат; Держатели предохранителей и батарей; Радиаторы; Провода-перемычки; Штыревые и гнездовые разъемы
tr: Elektronik > Devre Kartları ve Bileşenleri > Devre Kartı Aksesuarları: Devre Kartı Koruyucu Kılıflar; Devre Kartı Mesafe Tutucular ve Ara Parçalar; Sigorta ve Pil Tutucular; Isı Emiciler; Atlama Telleri; Pin Başlıkları ve Soket Başlıkları
sl-SI: Elektronika > Vezja in komponente > Dodatki za tiskana vezja: Zaščitna ohišja za tiskana vezja; Distančniki za tiskana vezja; Držala za varovalke in baterije; Hladilniki; DuPont kabli; Pinski in vtičniški konektorji
it: Elettronica > Circuiti stampati e componenti > Accessori per circuiti stampati: Custodie protettive per circuiti stampati; Distanziali e spaziatori della scheda di circuito; Supporti per fusibili e batterie; Dissipatori di calore; Cavi jumper; Intestazioni a pin (pin header) e a presa (socket header)
fi: Elektroniikka > Piirilevyt ja komponentit > Piirilevytarvikkeet: Piirilevyn suojakotelot; Piirilevyn tukijalka ja välike; Sulake- ja akkupidike; Jäähdytyselementit; Hyppylangat; Pinniriviliittimet ja pistokeliittimet
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > แผ่นและส่วนประกอบวงจร > อุปกรณ์แผ่นวงจร: เคสป้องกันแผงวงจร; ตัวค้ำและตัวแยกระยะแผงวงจร; ที่ใส่ฟิวส์และถ่านไฟ; แผงระบายความร้อน; สายจัมเปอร์; พินเฮดเดอร์และซ็อกเก็ตเฮดเดอร์
sv: Elektronik > Kretskort och kretskomponenter > Tillbehör för kretskort: Kretskortsskydd; Kretskortsdistanser och mellanlägg; Säkrings- och batterihållare; Värmefat; Byglingar; Stifthuvuden och sockelhuvuden
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Placas de circuito e componentes > Acessórios de placa de circuito: Capas protetoras para placas de circuito; Espaçadores e distanciadores para placas de circuito; Suportes para fusíveis e baterias; Dissipadores de calor; Cabos Jumper; Conectores de pinos e sockets
lt-LT: Elektronika > Grandynų plokštės ir komponentai > Grandynų plokščių priedai: Grandynų plokščių apsauginiai dėklai; Grandinės plokštės atramos ir tarpikliai; Lydžiosios jungės ir akumuliatorių laikikliai; Radiatoriai; Laidai su jungtimis; Kontaktų ir kištukų laikikliai
es: Electrónica > Componentes y placas de circuitos > Accesorios para placas de circuito: Fundas protectoras para placas de circuito; Espaciadores y separadores de placa de circuito; Portafusibles y portapilas; Disipadores de calor; Cables de salto; Pines y zócalos de encabezado
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Πλακέτες κυκλωμάτων & εξαρτήματα > Αξεσουάρ πλακετών κυκλωμάτων: Προστατευτικά καλύμματα πλακετών κυκλωμάτων; Αποστάτες & διαχωριστικά πλακετών κυκλωμάτων; Υποδοχές ασφαλειών & μπαταριών; Απαγωγοί θερμότητας (Ψύκτρες); Καλώδια γέφυρας; Βέργες ακίδων & υποδοχές
de: Elektronik > Elektronische Leiterplatten & Bauteile > Leiterplattenzubehör: Schutzhüllen für Leiterplatten; Platinen-Abstandshalter; Sicherungs- und Batteriehalter; Wärmeableiter; Überbrückungsdrähte; Stiftleisten und Buchsenleisten
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện và bảng mạch > Phụ kiện bảng mạch: Vỏ bảo vệ bảng mạch; Đệm và khoảng cách bo mạch; Kẹp cầu chì và pin; Bộ tản nhiệt; Cáp nối; Đầu chân và đầu ổ cắm
hu: Elektronika > Áramköri lapok és komponensek > Áramkörilap-kiegészítők: Áramkörilap-védőtokok; Áramkörikártya-távtartók és -spacerek; Biztosíték- és elemtartók; Hűtőbordák; Ugrókábelek; Tűs fejlécek és foglalatfejlécek
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Componentes e placas de circuitos > Acessórios para placas de circuito: Capas protetoras para placas de circuito; Espaçadores e suportes para placas de circuito; Suportes para fusíveis e baterias; Dissipadores de calor; Fios de salto; Pin headers e socket headers
ro-RO: Electronice > Plăci cu circuite și componente > Accesorii pentru plăcile cu circuite: Carcase de protecție pentru plăci cu circuite; Distanțiere și suporturi pentru plăci de circuite; Suporturi pentru siguranțe și baterii; Radiatoare; Punți de scurtcircuitare; Conectori pin și soclu